New Jersey, session 222, S1171.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.2021, c.375 (C.10:7-2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  Every individual present in the State, including, but not limited to, an individual who is under State control or supervision, shall have the fundamental right to: choose or refuse contraception or sterilization; [and] choose whether to carry a pregnancy, to give birth, or to terminate a pregnancy; and choose whether to use assisted reproductive technology, including, but not limited to in vitro fertilization. The New Jersey Constitution recognizes the fundamental nature of the right to reproductive choice, including the right to access contraception, to terminate a pregnancy, and to carry a pregnancy to term, shall not be abridged by any law, rule, regulation, ordinance, or order issued by any State, county, or local governmental authority.  Any law, rule, regulation, ordinance, or order, in effect on or adopted after the effective date of this act, that is determined to have the effect of limiting the constitutional right to freedom of reproductive choice and that does not conform with the provisions and the express or implied purposes of this act, shall be deemed invalid and shall have no force or effect. b.    The provisions of this section shall be enforceable under the "New Jersey Civil Rights Act," P.L.2004, c.143 (C.10:6-1 et seq.) or in any other manner provided by law. (cf: P.L.2021, c.375, s.2) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.